California statutes. Public Resources Code
(f) The interrelationship of policies and practices in the management of natural resources and waste disposal requires systematic and concerted efforts by public and private interests to enhance environmental quality and to control environmental pollution.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that all agencies of the state government which regulate activities of private individuals, corporations, and public agencies which are found to affect the quality of the environment, shall regulate such activities so that major consideration is given to preventing environmental damage, while providing a decent home and satisfying living environment for every Californian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to:

(a) Develop and maintain a high-quality environment now and in the future, and take all action necessary to protect, rehabilitate, and enhance the environmental quality of the state.

(b) Take all action necessary to provide the people of this state with clean air and water, enjoyment of aesthetic, natural, scenic, and historic environmental qualities, and freedom from excessive noise.

(c) Prevent the elimination of fish or wildlife species due to man’s activities, insure that fish and wildlife populations do not drop below self-prepetuating levels, and preserve for future generations representations of all plant and animal communities and examples of the major periods of California history.

(d) Ensure that the long-term protection of the environment, consistent with the provision of a decent home and suitable living environment for every Californian, shall be the guiding criterion in public decisions.

(e) Create and maintain conditions under which man and nature can exist in productive harmony to fulfill the social and economic requirements of present and future generations.

(f) Require governmental agencies at all levels to develop standards and procedures necessary to protect environmental quality.

(g) Require governmental agencies at all levels to consider qualitative factors as well as economic and technical factors and long-term benefits and costs, in addition to short-term benefits and costs and to consider alternatives to proposed actions affecting the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.1.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that projects to be carried out by public agencies be subject to the same level of review and consideration under this division as that of private projects required to be approved by public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1514, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that public agencies should not approve projects as proposed if there are feasible alternatives or feasible mitigation measures available which would substantially lessen the significant environmental effects of such projects, and that the procedures required by this division are intended to assist public agencies in systematically identifying both the significant effects of proposed projects and the feasible alternatives or feasible mitigation measures which will avoid or substantially lessen such significant effects. The Legislature further finds and declares that in the event specific economic, social, or other conditions make infeasible such project alternatives or such mitigation measures, individual projects may be approved in spite of one or more significant effects thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 277.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.1.

In order to achieve the objectives set forth in Section 21002, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following policy shall apply to the use of environmental impact reports prepared pursuant to this division:

(a) The purpose of an environmental impact report is to identify the significant effects on the environment of a project, to identify alternatives to the project, and to indicate the manner in which those significant effects can be mitigated or avoided.

(b) Each public agency shall mitigate or avoid the significant effects on the environment of projects that it carries out or approves whenever it is feasible to do so.

(c) If economic, social, or other conditions make it infeasible to mitigate one or more significant effects on the environment of a project, the project may nonetheless be carried out or approved at the discretion of a public agency if the project is otherwise permissible under applicable laws and regulations.

(d) In applying the policies of subdivisions (b) and (c) to individual projects, the responsibility of the lead agency shall differ from that of a responsible agency. The lead agency shall be responsible for considering the effects, both individual and collective, of all activities involved in a project. A responsible agency shall be responsible for considering only the effects of those activities involved in a project which it is required by law to carry out or approve. This subdivision applies only to decisions by a public agency to carry out or approve a project and does not otherwise affect the scope of the comments that the public agency may wish to make pursuant to Section 21104 or 21153.

(e) To provide more meaningful public disclosure, reduce the time and cost required to prepare an environmental impact report, and focus on potentially significant effects on the environment of a proposed project, lead agencies shall, in accordance with Section 21100, focus the discussion in the environmental impact report on those potential effects on the environment of a proposed project which the lead agency has determined are or may be significant. Lead agencies may limit discussion on other effects to a brief explanation as to why those effects are not potentially significant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that:

(a) Local agencies integrate the requirements of this division with planning and environmental review procedures otherwise required by law or by local practice so that all those procedures, to the maximum feasible extent, run concurrently, rather than consecutively.

(b) Documents prepared pursuant to this division be organized and written in a manner that will be meaningful and useful to decisionmakers and to the public.

(c) Environmental impact reports omit unnecessary descriptions of projects and emphasize feasible mitigation measures and feasible alternatives to projects.

(d) Information developed in individual environmental impact reports be incorporated into a data base which can be used to reduce delay and duplication in preparation of subsequent environmental impact reports.

(e) Information developed in environmental impact reports and negative declarations be incorporated into a data base which may be used to make subsequent or supplemental environmental determinations.

(f) All persons and public agencies involved in the environmental review process be responsible for carrying out the process in the most efficient, expeditious manner in order to conserve the available financial, governmental, physical, and social resources with the objective that those resources may be better applied toward the mitigation of actual significant effects on the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.1.

The Legislature further finds and declares it is the policy of the state that:

(a) Comments from the public and public agencies on the environmental effects of a project shall be made to lead agencies as soon as possible in the review of environmental documents, including, but not limited to, draft environmental impact reports and negative declarations, in order to allow the lead agencies to identify, at the earliest possible time in the environmental review process, potential significant effects of a project, alternatives, and mitigation measures which would substantially reduce the effects.

(b) Information relevant to the significant effects of a project, alternatives, and mitigation measures which substantially reduce the effects shall be made available as soon as possible by lead agencies, other public agencies, and interested persons and organizations.

(c) Nothing in subdivisions (a) or (b) reduces or otherwise limits public review or comment periods currently prescribed either by statute or in guidelines prepared and adopted pursuant to Section 21083 for environmental documents, including, but not limited to, draft environmental impact reports and negative declarations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21004.

In mitigating or avoiding a significant effect of a project on the environment, a public agency may exercise only those express or implied powers provided by law other than this division. However, a public agency may use discretionary powers provided by such other law for the purpose of mitigating or avoiding a significant effect on the environment subject to the express or implied constraints or limitations that may be provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1438, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21005.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that noncompliance with the information disclosure provisions of this division which precludes relevant information from being presented to the public agency, or noncompliance with substantive requirements of this division, may constitute a prejudicial abuse of discretion within the meaning of Sections 21168 and 21168.5, regardless of whether a different outcome would have resulted if the public agency had complied with those provisions.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in undertaking judicial review pursuant to Sections 21168 and 21168.5, courts shall continue to follow the established principle that there is no presumption that error is prejudicial. 

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that any court, which finds, or, in the process of reviewing a previous court finding, finds, that a public agency has taken an action without compliance with this division, shall specifically address each of the alleged grounds for noncompliance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21006.

The Legislature finds and declares that this division is an integral part of any public agency’s decisionmaking process, including, but not limited to, the issuance of permits, licenses, certificates, or other entitlements required for activities undertaken pursuant to federal statutes containing specific waivers of sovereign immunity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Short Title [21050. - 21050.]

21050.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Environmental Quality Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Definitions [21060. - 21074.]

21060.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.1.

(a) “Agricultural land” means prime farmland, farmland of statewide importance, or unique farmland, as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California.

(b) In those areas of the state where lands have not been surveyed for the classifications specified in subdivision (a), “agricultural land” means land that meets the requirements of “prime agricultural land” as defined in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 51201 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 812, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.2.

(a) “Bus rapid transit” means a public mass transit service provided by a public agency or by a public-private partnership that includes all of the following features:

(1) Full-time dedicated bus lanes or operation in a separate right-of-way dedicated for public transportation with a frequency of service interval of 15 minutes or less during the morning and afternoon peak commute periods.

(2) Transit signal priority.

(3) All-door boarding.

(4) Fare collection system that promotes efficiency.

(5) Defined stations.

(b) “Bus rapid transit station” means a clearly defined bus station served by a bus rapid transit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.   (AB 1560)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.3.

“Emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence, involving a clear and imminent danger, demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss of, or damage to, life, health, property, or essential public services. “Emergency” includes such occurrences as fire, flood, earthquake, or other soil or geologic movements, as well as such occurrences as riot, accident, or sabotage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.4.

“Distribution center” means a warehouse distribution center, as defined in Section 2100 of the Labor Code, that is 50,000 square feet or larger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 3.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.5.

“Environment” means the physical conditions which exist within the area which will be affected by a proposed project, including land, air, water, minerals, flora, fauna, noise, objects of historic or aesthetic significance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.

“Environmental impact report” means a detailed statement setting forth the matters specified in Sections 21100 and 21100.1; provided that information or data which is relevant to such a statement and is a matter of public record or is generally available to the public need not be repeated in its entirety in such statement, but may be specifically cited as the source for conclusions stated therein; and provided further that such information or data shall be briefly described, that its relationship to the environmental impact report shall be indicated, and that the source thereof shall be reasonably available for inspection at a public place or public building. An environmental impact report also includes any comments which are obtained pursuant to Section 21104 or 21153, or which are required to be obtained pursuant to this division.

An environmental impact report is an informational document which, when its preparation is required by this division, shall be considered by every public agency prior to its approval or disapproval of a project. The purpose of an environmental impact report is to provide public agencies and the public in general with detailed information about the effect which a proposed project is likely to have on the environment; to list ways in which the significant effects of such a project might be minimized; and to indicate alternatives to such a project.

In order to facilitate the use of environmental impact reports, public agencies shall require that such reports contain an index or table of contents and a summary. Failure to include such index, table of contents, or summary shall not constitute a cause of action pursuant to Section 21167.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.1.

“Feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.2.

“Land evaluation and site assessment” means a decisionmaking methodology for assessing the potential environmental impact of state and local projects on agricultural land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.3.

“Infill site” means a site in an urbanized area that meets either of the following criteria:

(a) The site has not been previously developed for urban uses and both of the following apply:

(1) The site is immediately adjacent to parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses, or at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses, and the remaining 25 percent of the site adjoins parcels that have previously been developed for qualified urban uses.

(2) No parcel within the site has been created within the past 10 years unless the parcel was created as a result of the plan of a redevelopment agency.

(b) The site has been previously developed for qualified urban uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 728, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21062.

“Local agency” means any public agency other than a state agency, board, or commission. For purposes of this division a redevelopment agency and a local agency formation commission are local agencies, and neither is a state agency, board, or commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 222.)
-------------------------------------------

21063.

“Public agency” includes any state agency, board, or commission, any county, city and county, city, regional agency, public district, redevelopment agency, or other political subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21064.

“Negative declaration” means a written statement briefly describing the reasons that a proposed project will not have a significant effect on the environment and does not require the preparation of an environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21064.3.

“Major transit stop” means a site containing any of the following:

(a) An existing rail or bus rapid transit station.

(b) A ferry terminal served by either a bus or rail transit service.

(c) The intersection of two or more major bus routes with a frequency of service interval of 20 minutes or less during the morning and afternoon peak commute periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 2553)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21064.5.

“Mitigated negative declaration” means a negative declaration prepared for a project when the initial study has identified potentially significant effects on the environment, but (1) revisions in the project plans or proposals made by, or agreed to by, the applicant before the proposed negative declaration and initial study are released for public review would avoid the effects or mitigate the effects to a point where clearly no significant effect on the environment would occur, and (2) there is no substantial evidence in light of the whole record before the public agency that the project, as revised, may have a significant effect on the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21064.8.

“Oil and gas infrastructure” means a facility used for the production, processing, transmission, storage, or distribution of petroleum or natural gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 4.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21065.

“Project” means an activity which may cause either a direct physical change in the environment, or a reasonably foreseeable indirect physical change in the environment, and which is any of the following:

(a) An activity directly undertaken by any public agency.

(b) An activity undertaken by a person which is supported, in whole or in part, through contracts, grants, subsidies, loans, or other forms of assistance from one or more public agencies.

(c) An activity that involves the issuance to a person of a lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use by one or more public agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21065.3.

“Project-specific effect” means all the direct or indirect environmental effects of a project other than cumulative effects and growth-inducing effects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21065.5.

“Geothermal exploratory project” means a project as defined in Section 21065 composed of not more than six wells and associated drilling and testing equipment, whose chief and original purpose is to evaluate the presence and characteristics of geothermal resources prior to commencement of a geothermal field development project as defined in Section 65928.5 of the Government Code. Wells included within a geothermal exploratory project must be located at least one-half mile from geothermal development wells which are capable of producing geothermal resources in commercial quantities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

21066.

“Person” includes any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust, corporation, limited liability company, company, district, county, city and county, city, town, the state, and any of the agencies and political subdivisions of those entities, and, to the extent permitted by federal law, the United States, or any of its agencies or political subdivisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 272, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21067.

“Lead agency” means the public agency which has the principal responsibility for carrying out or approving a project which may have a significant effect upon the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21067.5.

“Natural and protected lands” means sites located within any of the following locations:

(a) The state park system, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5001) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.

(b) A wilderness area, as defined in Section 5093.32.

(c) A marine protected area, as defined in Section 2852 of the Fish and Game Code.

(d) The national park system, as defined in Section 100102 of Title 54 of the United States Code.

(e) A national recreation area.

(f) A national monument.

(g) The national wild and scenic rivers system, as defined in Section 1273 of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(h) Any ecological reserve or wildlife management area acquired and managed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1525) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 1580) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(i) A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 25356 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following apply:

(1) The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform
 closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for the use proposed by the project. This paragraph does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(2) The State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code has otherwise determined that the site is suitable for the use proposed by the project.

(j) Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the
 development has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) Lands under conservation easement.

(l) On, or within a 300-foot radius of, a wetland, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).

(m) An environmentally sensitive area within the coastal zone, as defined in Section 30107.5.

(n) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.

(o) Within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or within the state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102. This subdivision does not apply to sites that have adopted fire hazard mitigation measures pursuant to existing building standards or state fire mitigation measures applicable to the development, including, but not limited to, standards established under all of the following provisions or their successor provisions:

(1) Section 4291 of this code or Section 51182 of the Government Code, as applicable.

(2) Section 4290.

(3) Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(p) Either prime farmland or farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to the United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 650, Sec. 6.   (SB 158)   Effective October 11, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21068.

“Significant effect on the environment” means a substantial, or potentially substantial, adverse change in the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21068.5.

“Tiering” or “tier” means the coverage of general matters and environmental effects in an environmental impact report prepared for a policy, plan, program or ordinance followed by narrower or site-specific environmental impact reports which incorporate by reference the discussion in any prior environmental impact report and which concentrate on the environmental effects which (a) are capable of being mitigated, or (b) were not analyzed as significant effects on the environment in the prior environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21069.

“Responsible agency” means a public agency, other than the lead agency, which has responsibility for carrying out or approving a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21070.

“Trustee agency” means a state agency that has jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by a project, that are held in trust for the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 744, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21071.

“Urbanized area” means either of the following:

(a) An incorporated city that meets either of the following criteria:

(1) Has a population of at least 100,000 persons.

(2) Has a population of less than 100,000 persons if the population of that city and not more than two contiguous incorporated cities combined equals at least 100,000 persons.

(b) An unincorporated area that satisfies the criteria in both paragraph (1) and (2) of the following criteria:

(1) Is either of the following:

(A) Completely surrounded by one or more incorporated cities, and both of the following criteria are met:

(i) The population of the unincorporated area and the population of the surrounding incorporated city or cities equals not less than 100,000 persons.

(ii) The population density of the unincorporated area at least equals the population density of the surrounding city or cities.

(B) Located within an urban growth boundary and has an existing residential population of at least 5,000 persons per square mile. For purposes of this subparagraph, an “urban growth boundary” means a provision of a locally adopted general plan that allows urban uses on one side of the boundary and prohibits urban uses on the other side.

(2) The board of supervisors with jurisdiction over the unincorporated area has previously taken both of the following actions:

(A) Issued a finding that the general plan, zoning ordinance, and related policies and programs applicable to the unincorporated area are consistent with principles that encourage compact development in a manner that does both of the following:

(i) Promotes efficient transportation systems, economic growth, affordable housing, energy efficiency, and an appropriate balance of jobs and housing.

(ii) Protects the environment, open space, and agricultural areas.

(B) Submitted a draft finding to the Office of Planning and Research at least 30 days prior to issuing a final finding, and allowed the office 30 days to submit comments on the draft findings to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21072.

“Qualified urban use” means any residential, commercial, public institutional, transit or transportation passenger facility, or retail use, or any combination of those uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21073.

“California Native American tribe” means a Native American tribe located in California that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21074.

(a) “Tribal cultural resources” are either of the following:

(1) Sites, features, places, cultural landscapes, sacred places, and objects with cultural value to a California Native American tribe that are either of the following:

(A) Included or determined to be eligible for inclusion in the California Register of Historical Resources.

(B) Included in a local register of historical resources as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1.

(2) A resource determined by the lead agency, in its discretion and
 supported by substantial evidence, to be significant pursuant to criteria set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5024.1. In applying the criteria set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5024.1 for the purposes of this paragraph, the lead agency shall consider the significance of the resource to a California Native American tribe.

(b) A cultural landscape that meets the criteria of subdivision (a) is a tribal cultural resource to the extent that the landscape is geographically defined in terms of the size and scope of the landscape.

(c) A historical resource described in Section 21084.1, a unique archaeological resource as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 21083.2, or a “nonunique archaeological resource” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 21083.2 may also be a tribal cultural resource if it conforms with the criteria of subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 4.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.6. General [21080. - 21098.]

21080.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, this division shall apply to discretionary projects proposed to be carried out or approved by public agencies, including, but not limited to, the enactment and amendment of zoning ordinances, the issuance of zoning variances, the issuance of conditional use permits, and the approval of tentative subdivision maps unless the project is exempt from this division.

(b) This division does not apply to any of the following activities:

(1) Ministerial projects proposed to be carried out or approved by public agencies.

(2) Emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service.

(3) Projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to maintain, repair, restore, demolish, or replace property or facilities damaged or destroyed as a result of a disaster in a disaster-stricken area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) Specific actions necessary to prevent or mitigate an emergency.

(5) Projects that a public agency rejects or disapproves.

(6) Actions undertaken by a public agency relating to any thermal
 powerplant site or facility, including the expenditure, obligation, or encumbrance of funds by a public agency for planning, engineering, or design purposes, or for the conditional sale or purchase of equipment, fuel, water (except groundwater), steam, or power for a thermal powerplant, if the powerplant site and related facility will be the subject of an environmental impact report, negative declaration, or other document, prepared pursuant to a regulatory program certified pursuant to Section 21080.5, which will be prepared by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, by the Public Utilities Commission, or by the city or county in which the powerplant and related facility would be located if the environmental impact report, negative declaration, or document includes the environmental impact, if any, of the action described in this paragraph.

(7) (A) Activities or approvals for the bidding, hosting or staging of, and funding of, an Olympic Games and a Paralympic Games under the authority of the International Olympic Committee or the International Paralympic Committee, except for the construction of facilities necessary for the Olympic Games or Paralympic Games.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the division does not apply to the construction of temporary facilities for the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games. For purposes of this
 subparagraph, “temporary facility” means a facility that will be completely removed and the area restored to a clean and safe condition within six months after the end of the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games.

(C) Any confirmed changes to the locations of the competition venues of the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games venue plan, pursuant to the host city contract and games agreement with the City of Los Angeles, shall be noticed publicly on the organizing committee’s official internet website and shall be noticed in a newspaper or other medium of general circulation in the local jurisdiction notifying the public of the change in location of the venue.

(D) This
 paragraph does not limit any other applicable statute or regulation governing impacts from temporary facilities to, among others, sensitive wildlife habitats, including, but not limited to, riparian lands, wetlands, bays, estuaries, marshes, and habitats for endangered, rare, and threatened species.

(8) The establishment, modification, structuring, restructuring, or approval of rates, tolls, fares, or other charges by public agencies that the public agency finds are for the purpose of: (A) meeting operating expenses, including employee wage rates and fringe benefits; (B) purchasing or leasing supplies, equipment, or materials; (C) meeting financial reserve needs and requirements; (D) obtaining funds for capital projects necessary to maintain service within existing service areas; or (E) obtaining funds necessary to
 maintain those intracity transfers as are authorized by city charter. The public agency shall incorporate written findings in the record of any proceeding in which an exemption under this paragraph is claimed setting forth with specificity the basis for the claim of exemption.

(9) All classes of projects designated pursuant to Section 21084.

(10) A project for the institution or increase of passenger or commuter services on rail or highway rights-of-way already in use, including modernization of existing stations and parking facilities. For purposes of this paragraph, “highway” has the same meaning as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code.

(11) A project for the institution or increase of passenger or commuter service
 on high-occupancy vehicle lanes already in use, including the modernization of existing stations and parking facilities.

(12) Facility extensions not to exceed four miles in length that are required for the transfer of passengers from or to exclusive public mass transit guideway or busway public transit services.

(13) A project for the development of a regional transportation improvement program, the state transportation improvement program, or a congestion management program prepared pursuant to Section 65089 of the Government Code.

(14) A project or portion of a project located in another state that will be subject to environmental impact review pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321
 et seq.) or similar state laws of that state. Any emissions or discharges that would have a significant effect on the environment in this state are subject to this division.

(15) Projects undertaken by a local agency to implement a rule or regulation imposed by a state agency, board, or commission under a certified regulatory program pursuant to Section 21080.5. Any site-specific effect of the project that was not analyzed as a significant effect on the environment in the plan or other written documentation required by Section 21080.5 is subject to this division.

(16) Approval by the Department of Pesticide Regulation of a pesticide emergency exemption pursuant to Section 136p of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(c) If a lead agency determines that a proposed project, not otherwise exempt from this division, would not have a significant effect on the environment, the lead agency shall adopt a negative
 declaration to that effect. The negative declaration shall be prepared for the proposed project in either of the following circumstances:

(1) There is no substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that the project may have a significant effect on the environment.
